California, session 20252026, AB2323.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6009 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 6008, to read:6009. (a) When any public notice is legally required by a statute, ordinance, bylaw, or judicial order to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, that notice shall be published in and on both of the following:(1) The newspaper’s print publication.(2) The newspaper’s internet website or electronic newspaper available on the internet.(b) (1) A newspaper shall not charge a fee or surcharge specifically to access public notices on their internet website. However, a newspaper may continue to charge a fee or surcharge for access to other content on their internet website.(2) A newspaper shall not charge an additional fee or surcharge specifically for posting a public notice described in subdivision (a) to the newspaper’s internet website.(c) An error in the legal notice published on a newspaper’s internet website that is a result of either (1) an error of the internet website operator or (2) a temporary internet website outage or service interruption that prevents the publication or display of a legal notice on the internet website shall not constitute a defect in publication of the legal notice if the legal notice appears correctly in the newspaper’s print publication and satisfies all other legal notice requirements.